Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1968
Requirement for and duties of board of directors.

(a) Each corporation must have a board of directors.

(b) Except as provided in the Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act or subsection (c) of this section, all corporate powers shall be exercised by or under the authority of, and the affairs of the corporation managed under the direction of, its board.

(c) The articles may authorize a person or persons to exercise some or all of the powers which would otherwise be exercised by a board. To the extent so authorized any such person or persons shall have the duties and responsibilities of the directors, and the directors shall be relieved to that extent from such duties and responsibilities.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 68.